District of Columbia statutes.
4-608

Rules.

The Mayor may, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules for:

(1)

Determining the unreimbursed value of health or health-related care and treatment that the District undertakes to provide directly;

(2)

Determining the appropriateness and amount of a District contribution under § 4-607(b);

(3)

Establishing procedures to implement the notice requirements in § 4-606; and

(4)

Facilitating the District’s compliance with applicable federal regulations.

History

June 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-86, § 9, 31 DCR 2098

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-508.